District of Columbia statutes.
8-2011

Maintenance of records.

(a)

The owner or operator of a horse-drawn carriage trade shall maintain or require his or her driver to maintain a daily record of travel for each carriage used, which shall include:

(1)

The name of the driver;

(2)

The driver’s license number;

(3)

The horse-drawn carriage trade license number;

(4)

The identification card number of the horse that hauls or pulls the carriage;

(5)

The date;

(6)

The hours of operation;

(7)

The specific location, time, and number of passengers for each ride in the carriage;

(8)

The rest, water, and feeding times for the horse; and

(9)

A description of any and all traffic accidents.

(b)

The owner or operator of a horse-drawn carriage trade shall maintain a complete log of all records at his or her place of business.

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-224, § 12, 38 DCR 207

History

1981 Ed., § 6-1041.

Prior Codifications